Maryland, session 2025, SB0073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
3–302.
(a) (1) There is an Environmental Trust Fund.
(d) (3) The Chesapeake Bay Trust shall receive $375,000 from the Fund each
fiscal year for the purpose of funding energy conservation projects through the THOMAS
V. MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake Conservation AND CLIMATE Corps Program, as
provided under §§ 8–1913 through 8–1924 of this article.
Part II. THOMAS V. MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake Conservation AND CLIMATE
Corps Program.
8–1913.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Corps Program” means the THOMAS V. MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake
Conservation AND CLIMATE Corps Program established under § 8–1914 of this part.
8–1914.
(a) There is a THOMAS V. MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake Conservation AND
CLIMATE Corps Program administered by the Trust, in consultation with the Corps Board.
8–1917.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 533
(a) (1) The Trust, in consultation with the Corps Board, shall make grants to
qualified organizations for the creation or expansion of full– and part–time THOMAS V.
MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake Conservation AND CLIMATE Corps Programs, that
involve citizens of all ages throughout the State, to carry out this part.
(2) Corps programs shall engage and develop volunteers and stipend
volunteers in environmental and energy conservation projects.
(3) Eligible Corps Program expenses include personnel costs, stipends,
supplies, and other materials for projects undertaken by Corps Program volunteers.
8–1919.
(b) The Trust shall convene THOMAS V. MIKE MILLER, JR., Chesapeake
Conservation AND CLIMATE Corps Program participants on a regular basis in order to:
(1) Promote team building among the participants;
(2) Develop an understanding of the overall Corps Program purpose;
(3) Share information about best practices;
(4) Recognize excellence; and
(5) Provide training and other learning opportunities.
Article – State Government
21–206.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Service Year Option Pathway in the Program.
(f) (3) Appropriations made under paragraph (1) of this subsection and other
funding received by the Department for the MSY Pathway under this section shall be used
to:
(iv) cover programmatic expenses to expand service opportunities
throughout the State, including expanding the THOMAS V. MIKE MILLER, JR.,
Chesapeake Conservation AND CLIMATE Corps Program, as provided under §§ 8–1913
through 8–1924 of the Natural Resources Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –